Mississippi, session 2026, HB1770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-35-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-35-7.  (1)  Prior to operating a fully autonomous vehicle on the public roads of this state without a human driver, a person shall submit a law enforcement interaction plan to the Department of Public Safety that describes: (a)  How to communicate with a fleet support specialist who is available during the times the vehicle is in operation; (b)  How to safely remove the fully autonomous vehicle from the roadway and steps to safely tow the vehicle; (c)  How to recognize whether the fully autonomous vehicle is in autonomous mode; (d)  Any additional information the manufacturer or owner deems necessary regarding hazardous conditions or public safety risks associated with the operation of the fully autonomous vehicle; and (e)  Other elements determined to be necessary by the Department of Public Safety and made publicly available on the Department of Public Safety's website by July 1, 2023. (2)  If a person fails to submit a law enforcement interaction plan prescribed by subsection (1) of this section, the Department of Public Safety may immediately issue a cease-and-desist letter prohibiting the operation of the person's fully autonomous vehicle on public roads of this state until the person submits the law enforcement interaction plan. (3)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, * * *2026 2029. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.